nl: Geschikte speellocatie: Achtertuin/buiten; Bad; Strand; Zwembad; Zandtafel; Zandbak; Watertafel; Overig
ko: 적합한 놀이 장소: 뒷마당/야외; 욕조; 해변; 수영장; 모래놀이 테이블; 모래밭; 물놀이 테이블; 기타
th: สถานที่เล่นที่เหมาะสม: สวนหลังบ้าน/กลางแจ้ง; อ่างอาบน้ำ; ชายหาด; สระว่ายน้ำ; กระบะทรายแบบโต๊ะ; กระบะทราย; โต๊ะเล่นน้ำ; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Loc de joacă potrivit: Curte/exterior; Cadă; Plajă; Piscină; Masă cu nisip; Cutie cu nisip; Masă cu apă; Altele
sl-SI: Primerno mesto za igro: Dvorišče / na prostem; Kopalna kad; Plaža; Bazen; Miza za pesek; Peskovnik; Miza za vodo; Drugo
it: Posizione di gioco adatta: Cortile/Esterno; Vasca da bagno; Spiaggia; Piscina; Tavolo per sabbia; Sabbiera; Tavolo da gioco con acqua; Altro
sv: Lämplig lekmiljö: Trädgård/utomhus; Badkar; Strand; Pool; Sandbord; Sandlåda; Vattenbord; Övrigt
cs: Vhodné místo pro hru: Zahrada / venkovní prostor; Vana; Pláž; Bazén; Stůl na písek; Pískoviště; Vodní stůl; Jiné
da: Egnet legested: Baghave/udendørs; Badekar; Strand; Pool; Sandbord; Sandkasse; Vandbord; Andet
pl: Odpowiednie miejsce do zabawy: Podwórko/na zewnątrz; Wanna; Plaża; Basen; Stolik do piasku; Piaskownica; Stolik wodny; Inne
vi: Địa điểm vui chơi phù hợp: Sân sau/ngoài trời; Bồn tắm; Bãi biển; Hồ bơi; Bàn cát; Hố cát; Bàn chơi nước; Khác
zh-CN: 适用玩耍地点: 后院/户外; 浴缸; 海滩; 游泳池; 沙盘; 沙坑; 玩水桌; 其他
bg-BG: Подходящо място за игра: Заден двор / на открито; Вана; Плаж; Басейн; Маса за пясък; Пясъчник; Водна маса; Друго
ru: Подходящее место для игры: Во дворе/на улице; Ванна; Пляж; Бассейн; Стол для песка; Песочница; Стол для игр с водой; Другое
hu: Alkalmas játékhely: Udvar/kültér; Fürdőkád; Strand; Medence; Homokasztal; Homokozó; Vizes asztal; Egyéb
pt-PT: Local adequado para brincar: Quintal/exterior; Banheira; Praia; Piscina; Mesa de areia; Caixa de areia; Mesa de água; Outro
pt-BR: Local adequado para a atividade: Quintal/Ar livre; Banheira; Praia; Piscina; Mesa de areia; Caixa de areia; Mesa de água; Outros
ja: 表面プレイ位置: 裏庭/屋外; 浴槽; ビーチ; プール; サンドテーブル; 砂場; ウォーターテーブル; その他
es: Ubicación de juego adecuada: Patio o exteriores; Bañera; Playa; Piscina; Mesa de arena; Arenero; Mesa de agua; Otro
tr: Uygun oyun alanı: Arka bahçe/dış mekan; Küvet; Plaj; Havuz; Kum masası; Kum havuzu; Su masası; Diğer
el: Κατάλληλη τοποθεσία παιχνιδιού: Αυλή/εξωτερικός χώρος; Μπανιέρα; Παραλία; Πισίνα; Τραπέζι άμμου; Αμμοδόχος; Τραπέζι νερού; Άλλο
zh-TW: 適用遊玩地點: 後院/戶外; 浴缸; 海灘; 游泳池; 玩沙桌; 沙坑; 玩水桌; 其他
sk-SK: Vhodná poloha na hranie: Dvor/exteriér; Vaňa; Pláž; Bazén; Pieskový stôl; Pieskovisko; Vodný stôl; Iné
nb: Passende lekested: Hage/utendørs; Badekar; Strand; Basseng; Sandbord; Sandkasse; Vannbord; Annet
en: Suitable play location: Backyard/outdoor; Bathtub; Beach; Pool; Sand table; Sandbox; Water table; Other
lt-LT: Tinkama žaidimo vieta: Kiemas / laukas; Vonia; Paplūdimys; Baseinas; Smėlio stalas; Smėlio dėžė; Vandens stalas; Kita
hr-HR: Prikladna lokacija za igru: Dvorište/na otvorenom; Kada; Plaža; Bazen; Stol za pijesak; Pješčanik; Stol za vodu; Ostalo
fr: Un endroit adapté pour jouer: Jardin/Extérieur; Baignoire; Plage; Piscine; Table à sable; Bac à sable; Table à eau; Autre
fi: Sopiva leikkisijainti: Takapiha/ulkona; Kylpyamme; Ranta; Uima-allas; Hiekkapöytä; Hiekkalaatikko; Vesipöytä; Muu
de: Geeignete Spielorte: Garten/Draußen; Badewanne; Strand; Pool; Sandtisch; Sandkasten; Wassertisch; Sonstige